Wisconsin, session 2025, AB823.
do enact as follows:AB823,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB823,28Section 2. 20.435 (4) (bu) of the statutes is created to read:AB823,2,12920.435 (4) (bu) Payment processing program for farmers. Biennially, the 10amounts in the schedule to provide electronic benefit transfer and credit and debit 11card processing equipment and services to farmers’ markets and farmers who sell 12directly to consumers under s. 49.79 (7s).AB823,313Section 3. 49.79 (7s) of the statutes is created to read:AB823,2,211449.79 (7s) Payment processing program. The department shall administer 15a payment processing program to provide to farmers’ markets and farmers who sell 16directly to consumers electronic benefit transfer and credit and debit card 17processing equipment and services, including electronic benefit transfer for the food 18stamp program. To participate in the payment processing program, the vendor that 19is under contract to process the electronic benefit transfer and credit and debit card 20transactions shall also process any local purchasing incentives, even if those local 21purchasing incentives are funded by a local third-party entity.AB823,422Section 4. Nonstatutory provisions.AB823,3,51(1) Payment processing program; position. The authorized FTE positions 2for the department of health services are increased by 0.625 GPR position, to be 3funded from the appropriation under s. 20.435 (4) (bu), for the purpose of 4coordinating the payment processing program and providing other services under s. 549.79 (7s).AB823,56Section 5. Fiscal changes.AB823,3,117(1) Healthy food incentive program. In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) 8for the appropriation to the department of health services under s. 20.435 (4) (bt), 9the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by $1,000,000 and the dollar 10amount for fiscal year 2026-27 is increased by $1,000,000 to support the healthy 11food incentive program under s. 49.79 (7w).AB823,3,1212